Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.098

Quarantine, hold order, or destruct order—Written request for hearing.

Any person whose animal or animal reproductive products are placed under a quarantine, a hold order, or destruct order under RCW 16.36.090 may request a hearing. The request for a hearing must be in writing and filed with the director. Any hearing will be held in conformance with RCW 34.05.422 and 34.05.479.

[ 2004 c 251 s 4; 1998 c 8 s 17.]